District of Columbia statutes.
11-1106

Reports to Congress.

Not later than 90 days after the end of each calendar year, the chief judge of the Superior Court shall submit a report to Congress on the activities of the Family Court during the year, and shall include in the report the following:

(1)

The chief judge’s assessment of the productivity and success of the use of alternative dispute resolution pursuant to section 11-1102.

(2)

Goals and timetables as required by the Adoption and Safe Families Act of 1997 to improve the Family Court’s performance in the following year.

(3)

Information on the extent to which the Family Court met deadlines and standards applicable under Federal and District of Columbia law to the review and disposition of actions and proceedings under the Family Court’s jurisdiction during the year.

(4)

Information on the progress made in establishing locations and appropriate space for the Family Court that are consistent with the mission of the Family Court until such time as the locations and space are established.

(5)

Information on any factors which are not under the control of the Family Court which interfere with or prevent the Family Court from carrying out its responsibilities in the most effective manner possible.

(6)

Information on —

(A)

the number of judges serving on the Family Court as of the end of the year;

(B)

how long each such judge has served on the Family Court;

(C)

the number of cases retained outside the Family Court;

(D)

the number of reassignments to and from the Family Court; and

(E)

the ability to recruit qualified sitting judges to serve on the Family Court.

(7)

Based on outcome measures derived through the use of the information stored in electronic format under section 11-1104(d), an analysis of the Family Court’s efficiency and effectiveness in managing its case load during the year, including an analysis of the time required to dispose of actions and proceedings among the various categories of the Family Court’s jurisdiction, as prescribed by applicable law and best practices, including (but not limited to) best practices developed by the American Bar Association and the National Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges.

(8)

If the Family Court failed to meet the deadlines, standards, and outcome measures described in the previous paragraphs, a proposed remedial action plan to address the failure.

Jan. 8, 2002, 115 Stat. 2111, Pub. L. 107-114, § 4(a)
The Adoption and Safe Families Act of 1997, referred to in par. (2), is Pub. L. 105-89, 111 Stat. 2115.